Montana, session 2025, HB759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Limitations on limited liability company and partnership contributions to candidates
-- reporting requirements. (1) A candidate may only accept a contribution from a limited liability company or
partnership if the limited liability company or partnership is classified and taxed as a sole proprietorship or a
partnership, or the partnership is taxed as a partnership, for federal tax purposes. A candidate may not accept a
contribution from a limited liability company or partnership that is taxed as a C. corporation or an S. corporation
for federal tax purposes.
(2) A contribution from a limited liability company or partnership taxed as a sole proprietorship or
partnership, or a partnership taxed as a partnership, for federal tax purposes must be reported under the name
of the member or partner making the contribution subject to the disclosure requirements under 13-37-229.
(3) The member or partner reported as making a contribution to a candidate as a limited liability
company or partnership may not make a separate contribution as an individual and is subject to the individual
contribution limitations under 13-37-219 13-37-216.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as a new part of Title 13,
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 759
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 759
chapter 37, and the provisions of Title 13, chapter 37, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 759
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 759, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 759
INTRODUCED BY R. GREGG, S. FITZPATRICK
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING CAMPAIGN FINANCE LAWS; PROVIDING LIMITATIONS THAT ONLY A
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AND PARTNERSHIP THAT IS TAXED AS A SOLE PROPRIETORSHIP OR A
PARTNERSHIP, OR A PARTNERSHIP TAXED AS A PARTNERSHIP, MAY MAKE CONTRIBUTIONS TO A
CANDIDATE AND THAT THE CONTRIBUTIONS MUST BE REPORTED UNDER THE NAME OF THE
MEMBER OR PARTNER MAKING THE CONTRIBUTION; AND PROHIBITING AN INDIVIDUAL
CONTRIBUTION SEPARATE FROM THE CONTRIBUTION MADE BY THE MEMBER OR PARTNER OF THE
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OR PARTNERSHIP CLARIFYING CONTRIBUTION LIMITS.”